Alaska, session 34, SB83.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 21.42.422(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 07 (3) "health care provider" has the meaning given in AS 21.07.250. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 21.42.422 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 09 (c) A health care insurer shall reimburse a health care provider for health care 10 services, including behavioral health services, provided through telehealth on the same 11 basis and at least at the same rate as for comparable health care services provided in 12 person. A health care insurer may use a geographic pay differential to reimburse out- 13 of-state health care providers. 14 * Sec. 3. AS 29.10.200 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 01 (68) AS 29.20.420 (health care insurance plans). 02 * Sec. 4. AS 29.20 is amended by adding a new section to article 5 to read: 03 Sec. 29.20.420. Health care insurance plans. (a) If a municipality offers a 04 group health care insurance plan covering municipal employees, including by means 05 of self-insurance, the municipal health care insurance plan is subject to the 06 requirements of AS 21.42.422(c). 07 (b) This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities. 08 (c) In this section, "health care insurance plan" has the meaning given in 09 AS 21.54.500. 10 * Sec. 5. AS 39.30.090(a) is amended to read: 11 (a) The Department of Administration may obtain a policy or policies of group 12 insurance covering state employees, persons entitled to coverage under AS 14.25.168, 13 14.25.480, AS 22.25.090, AS 39.35.535, 39.35.880, or former AS 39.37.145, 14 employees of other participating governmental units, or persons entitled to coverage 15 under AS 23.15.136, subject to the following conditions: 16 (1) a group insurance policy shall provide one or more of the following 17 benefits: life insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance, weekly 18 indemnity insurance, hospital expense insurance, surgical expense insurance, dental 19 expense insurance, audiovisual insurance, or other medical care insurance; 20 (2) each eligible employee of the state, the spouse and the unmarried 21 children chiefly dependent on the eligible employee for support, and each eligible 22 employee of another participating governmental unit shall be covered by the group 23 policy, unless exempt under regulations adopted by the commissioner of 24 administration; 25 (3) a governmental unit may participate under a group policy if 26 (A) its governing body adopts a resolution authorizing 27 participation and payment of required premiums; 28 (B) a certified copy of the resolution is filed with the 29 Department of Administration; and 30 (C) the commissioner of administration approves the 31 participation in writing; 01 (4) in procuring a policy of group health or group life insurance as 02 provided under this section or excess loss insurance as provided in AS 39.30.091, the 03 Department of Administration shall comply with the dual choice requirements of 04 AS 21.86.310, and shall obtain the insurance policy from an insurer authorized to 05 transact business in the state under AS 21.09, a hospital or medical service corporation 06 authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.87, or a health maintenance 07 organization authorized to operate in this state under AS 21.86; an excess loss 08 insurance policy may be obtained from a life or health insurer authorized to transact 09 business in this state under AS 21.09 or from a hospital or medical service corporation 10 authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.87; 11 (5) the Department of Administration shall make available bid 12 specifications for desired insurance benefits or for administration of benefit claims and 13 payments to (A) all insurance carriers authorized to transact business in this state 14 under AS 21.09 and all hospital or medical service corporations authorized to transact 15 business under AS 21.87 who are qualified to provide the desired benefits; and (B) 16 insurance carriers authorized to transact business in this state under AS 21.09, hospital 17 or medical service corporations authorized to transact business under AS 21.87, and 18 third-party administrators licensed to transact business in this state and qualified to 19 provide administrative services; the specifications shall be made available at least once 20 every five years; the lowest responsible bid submitted by an insurance carrier, hospital 21 or medical service corporation, or third-party administrator with adequate servicing 22 facilities shall govern selection of a carrier, hospital or medical service corporation, or 23 third-party administrator under this section or the selection of an insurance carrier or a 24 hospital or medical service corporation to provide excess loss insurance as provided in 25 AS 39.30.091; 26 (6) if the aggregate of dividends payable under the group insurance 27 policy exceeds the governmental unit's share of the premium, the excess shall be 28 applied by the governmental unit for the sole benefit of the employees; 29 (7) a person receiving benefits under AS 14.25.110, AS 22.25, 30 AS 39.35, or former AS 39.37 may continue the life insurance coverage that was in 31 effect under this section at the time of termination of employment with the state or 01 participating governmental unit; 02 (8) a person electing to have insurance under (7) of this subsection 03 shall pay the cost of this insurance; 04 (9) for each permanent part-time employee electing coverage under 05 this section, the state shall contribute one-half the state contribution rate for permanent 06 full-time state employees, and the permanent part-time employee shall contribute the 07 other one-half; 08 (10) a person receiving benefits under AS 14.25, AS 22.25, AS 39.35, 09 or former AS 39.37 may obtain auditory, visual, and dental insurance for that person 10 and eligible dependents under this section; the level of coverage for persons over 65 11 shall be the same as that available before reaching age 65 except that the benefits 12 payable shall be supplemental to any benefits provided under the federal old age, 13 survivors, and disability insurance program; a person electing to have insurance under 14 this paragraph shall pay the cost of the insurance; the commissioner of administration 15 shall adopt regulations implementing this paragraph; 16 (11) a person receiving benefits under AS 14.25, AS 22.25, AS 39.35, 17 or former AS 39.37 may obtain long-term care insurance for that person and eligible 18 dependents under this section; a person who elects insurance under this paragraph 19 shall pay the cost of the insurance premium; the commissioner of administration shall 20 adopt regulations to implement this paragraph; 21 (12) each licensee holding a current operating agreement for a vending 22 facility under AS 23.15.010 - 23.15.210 shall be covered by the group policy that 23 applies to governmental units other than the state; 24 (13) a group health insurance policy covering employees of a 25 participating governmental unit must meet the requirements of AS 21.42.422(c). 26 * Sec. 6. AS 39.30.091 is amended to read: 27 Sec. 39.30.091. Authorization for self-insurance and excess loss insurance. 28 Notwithstanding AS 21.86.310 or AS 39.30.090, the Department of Administration 29 may provide, by means of self-insurance, one or more of the benefits listed in 30 AS 39.30.090(a)(1) for state employees eligible for the benefits by law or under a 31 collective bargaining agreement and for persons receiving benefits under AS 14.25, 01 AS 22.25, AS 39.35, or former AS 39.37, and their dependents. The department shall 02 procure any necessary excess loss insurance under AS 39.30.090. A self-insured 03 group health insurance plan covering active state employees provided under this 04 section is subject to the requirements of AS 21.42.422(c). 05 * Sec. 7. Section 14, ch. 38, SLA 2022, is amended to read: 06 Sec. 14. If secs. 9 and 10, ch. 38, SLA 2022, [OF THIS ACT] take effect under 07 sec. 13 of this Act, they take effect June 30, 2040 [2030]. 08 * Sec. 8. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.